Georgia statutes. TITLE 7 Banking And Finance
PART 13 Bank Fees

7-1-239.5.
[Reserved] Fee for instruments drawn on other institutions.

History.

Code 1981, §

7-1-239.5

, enacted by Ga. L. 1997, p. 572, § 1; repealed by Ga. L. 2016, p. 390, § 2-2/HB 811, effective July 1, 2016.

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 2017, p. 774, § 7/HB 323, part of an Act to revise, modernize, and correct the Code, repealed the reservation of this Code section.

Ga. L. 2022, p. 352, § 7(1)/HB 1428, part of an Act to revise, modernize, and correct the Code, designated this Code section as reserved, effective May 2, 2022.

7-1-239.6.
Convenience fees.

A financial institution or mortgage lender, as such term is defined by Code Section 7-1-1000, may charge a convenience fee provided that such fee is permissible in accordance with Code Section 13-1-15. For purposes of this Code section, the term “convenience fee” means any additional amount imposed to a consumer at the time of a transaction for the election of making a payment by electronic means. A convenience fee may include, but is not limited to, any fee charged for payment to an account with the assistance of a live representative or agent of the financial institution or mortgage lender, by telephone, using a voice response unit, or other electronic means. A convenience fee does not include a discount offered by a lender or merchant to a person for payment by cash, check, or similar means.

History.

Code 1981, §

7-1-239.6

, enacted by Ga. L. 2017, p. 193, § 5/HB 143.